Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 4

Criminal Penalties and Enforcement

53-11-401. Miscellaneous offenses — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person:

Who is subject to part 3 of this chapter, to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of § 53-11-308 or to distribute or dispense any controlled substance for any purposes other than those authorized by and consistent with the person's professional or occupational licensure or registration law, or to distribute or dispense any controlled substance in a manner prohibited by the person's professional or occupational licensure or registration law;

Who is a registrant to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by the registrant's registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by the registrant's registration to another registrant or other authorized person;

To refuse or fail to make, keep or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice or information required under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, except sanctions against a health care provider for the provider's failure to make a report required by § 53-11-309(a) shall be limited only to cases involving a pattern of willful failure to make such reports and, in those instances, the health care provider shall only be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the provider's licensing board;

To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4; or

Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft or other structure or place that is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, for the purpose of using these substances, or that is used for keeping or selling them in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

A violation of this section is a Class D felony; provided, however, a healthcare provider who fails to make a report required by § 53-11-309 shall not be guilty of a felony and shall be punishable only by the sanctions set forth in subdivision (a)(3); and provided, further, that a person who fails to comply with § 53-11-308(h) is not guilty of a felony and shall be punishable only by a civil penalty assessed by the provider's licensing board and only in cases involving a pattern of willful failure to comply.

Notwithstanding § 40-35-111, regarding the authorized fine for a Class D felony, the authorized fine for a violation of this section shall be as follows:

For a violation involving a Schedule I or II controlled substance $ 100,000

For a violation involving a Schedule III or IV controlled substance 50,000

For a violation involving a Schedule V or VI controlled substance 5,000

For a violation involving a Schedule VII controlled substance 1,000

For any other violation of this section not involving a scheduled controlled substance 20,000

Nothing contained in this section shall preclude a prosecution under the general drug laws.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 28; 1976, ch. 579, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1435; Acts 1990, ch. 980, § 13; 2010, ch. 663, §§ 2, 3; 2018, ch. 901, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 39-17-401 provides that title 39, ch. 17, part 4 and title 53, ch.11, parts 3 and 4 shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Drug Control Act of 1989.”

Some of the sections in this part refer to sections within the scope of title 39, chs. 1-6. Acts 1989, ch. 591 repealed title 39, chs. 1-6 effective November 1, 1989. See the notes under the repealed sections for information concerning the location of new material.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added “, except sanctions against a health care provider for the provider's failure to make a report required by § 53-11-309(a) shall be limited only to cases involving a pattern of willful failure to make such reports and, in those instances, the health care provider shall only be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the provider's licensing board” to the end of (a)(3); and added the proviso to the end of (b)(1).

The 2018 amendment added the second proviso in (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 663, § 4. March 30, 2010.

Acts 2018, ch. 901, § 3. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Definition of terms used in this part, § 39-17-402.

Drugs, criminal offenses, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Penalty for Class D felony, § 40-35-111.

Smoking offenses concerning children, §§ 39-15-407 — 39-15-413.

Use of drug law confiscations and fines to promote DARE programs or other drug abuse prevention programs, § 39-17-420.

Law Reviews.

Drug Treatment Courts and Emergent Experimentalist Government, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 831 (2000).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. The effect of the filing of a federal bankruptcy petition upon the commencement or continuation of confiscation proceedings against the individual filing for bankruptcy, OAG 91-62 (7/3/91).

Cited: Stuart v. State Department of Safety, 963 S.W.2d 28, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 96 (Tenn. 1998); State v. Dominy, 6 S.W.3d 472, 1999 Tenn. LEXIS 571 (Tenn. 1999); State v. Robinson, 139 S.W.3d 661, 2004 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 82 (Tenn. Crim. App. 2004); State v. Headley, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 817 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 29, 2009); State v. Seals, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 709 (Tenn. Crim. App. Aug. 27, 2010).

53-11-402. Fraud — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to:

Distribute as a registrant a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II, except pursuant to an order form as required by § 53-11-307;

Use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number that is fictitious, revoked, suspended or issued to another person;

Acquire or obtain, or attempt to acquire or attempt to obtain, possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge. Any person who violates this subdivision (a)(3) may, upon first conviction, have the sentence suspended and may as a condition of the suspension be required to participate in a program of rehabilitation at a drug treatment facility operated by the state or a comprehensive community mental health center;

Furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information from, any application, report or other document required to be kept or filed under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or any record required to be kept by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

Make, distribute or possess any punch, die, plate, stone or other thing designed to print, imprint or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint or device of another or any likeness of the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint or device of another upon any drug or container or labeling of any drug or container so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance; or

Notwithstanding § 71-5-2601, deceive or fail to disclose to a physician, nurse practitioner, ancillary staff or other health care provider from whom the person obtains a controlled substance or a prescription for a controlled substance that the person has received either the same controlled substance or a prescription for the same controlled substance or a controlled substance of similar therapeutic use or a prescription for a controlled substance of similar therapeutic use from another practitioner within the previous thirty (30) days.

A violation of this section is a Class D felony, except that a violation of subdivision (a)(6) is a Class A misdemeanor and any violation of subdivision (a)(6) involving more than two hundred fifty (250) units of a controlled substance is a Class E felony. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(1), a “unit” means an amount of a controlled substance in any form that would equate to the initial single individual dosage recommended by the manufacturer of the controlled substance.

Notwithstanding § 40-35-111, regarding the authorized fine for a Class D felony, the authorized fine for a violation of this section shall be as follows:

For a violation involving a Schedule I or II controlled substance $ 100,000

For a violation involving a Schedule III or IV controlled substance 50,000

For a violation involving a Schedule V or VI controlled substance 5,000

For a violation involving a Schedule VII controlled substance 1,000

For any other violation of this section not involving a scheduled controlled substance 20,000

Nothing contained in this section shall preclude a prosecution under the general drug laws.

Any person who violates subdivision (a)(3) may, upon first conviction, have the sentence suspended and may as a condition of the suspension be required to participate in a program of rehabilitation at a drug treatment facility operated by the state or a comprehensive community mental health center.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 29; 1972, ch. 597, §§ 5-7; T.C.A., § 52-1436; Acts 1990, ch. 980, § 14; 2009, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 880, § 23; 2016, ch. 1002, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. The controlled substances schedules, referred to in this section, appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 25, provided that the act, which amended subdivision (b)(1) effective from January 1, 2013, until July 1, 2016, shall be interpreted to be consistent with all state and federal laws addressing privacy of patient records.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 13, deleted the provisions of Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 29 that provided for the expiration of the amendments by Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 23. Therefore, the amendments by ch. 880, § 23 remain in effect.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (a)(6); and added “, except that a violation of subdivision (a)(6) is a Class A misdemeanor” to the end of (b)(1).

The 2012 amendment by ch. 880, as amended by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, in (b)(1), added “and any violation of subdivision (a)(6) involving more than two hundred fifty (250) units of a controlled substance is a Class E felony” to the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 4. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 29. January 1, 2013; provided, that, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations, including emergency rulemaking, the act shall take effect May 9, 2012; and provided further, that the provisions of the act shall expire and be of no force and effect after June 30, 2016, and on July 1, 2016, the existing provisions of title 53, chapter 10, part 3, shall be revived and reenacted as they were codified on March 1, 2012.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor and Class D felony, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1976-1977 — A Critical Survey, II. Offenses (Joseph G. Cook), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 3.

Cited: McLean v. State, 527 S.W.2d 76, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. 1975); State v. Cummings, 868 S.W.2d 661, 1992 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 310 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1992); State v. Vermillion, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 629 (Tenn. Crim. App. Aug. 10, 2007); State v. Stinnett, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 570 (Tenn. Crim. App. July 2, 2008); Ealey v. State, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 819 (Tenn. Crim. App. Oct. 14, 2008); State v. Nichols, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 333 (Tenn. Crim. App. May 8, 2009).

53-11-403. Criminal penalty not exclusive.

Any penalty imposed for a violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 30; T.C.A., § 52-1437; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 57.

Cross-References. Racketeer-influenced and corrupt organizations, title 39, ch. 12, part 2.

Cited: Stuart v. State Department of Safety, 963 S.W.2d 28, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 96 (Tenn. 1998).

53-11-404. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 53-11-404 (Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 31; T.C.A., § 52-1438), concerning foreign acquittal of crime, was repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 883, § 1 and 1990, ch. 989, § 1.

53-11-405. Enforcement officers.

Any officer or authorized representative of the Tennessee bureau of investigation designated by the director of that bureau may:

Carry firearms in the performance of the individual's official duties;

Execute and serve search warrants, arrest warrants, subpoenas and summonses issued under the authority of this state;

Make arrests without warrant for any offense under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, committed in the individual's presence, or if the individual has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing a violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4 that may constitute a felony;

Make seizures of property pursuant to part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4; or

Perform other law enforcement duties as the director of the bureau designates.

It is the duty of the principal, or of the comparable chief administrative officer designated by any other equivalent title, of any school, public, private, denominational or parochial, who has probable cause to believe that any person has committed, or is committing, any violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, upon the school grounds or within any buildings or structures embraced by such individual's administrative responsibility, to report the probable cause intelligence immediately to the sheriff of the county if the school is in an unincorporated area, or to the police chief or other equivalent law enforcement official if the school is located within an incorporated municipality.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 32; 1980, ch. 636, § 10; 1981, ch. 252, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1439; Acts 1996, ch. 675, §§ 58, 60, 61.

53-11-406. Inspection.

Prescriptions, orders and records, required by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, and stocks of controlled substances, shall be open for inspection only to federal, state, county and municipal officers whose duty it is to enforce the laws or regulations of this state or of the United States relating to controlled substances or narcotic drugs.

No officer having knowledge by virtue of the officer's office of the prescription, order or record shall divulge the knowledge, except in connection with a prosecution or proceeding in court or before a licensing or registration board or officer if the person to whom the prescriptions, orders or records relate is a party to the prosecution or proceeding.

An inspection authorized by this section shall not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data, unless the owner, operator or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 33; T.C.A., § 52-1440; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 59.

Attorney General Opinions. The legal duty of pharmacies to allow inspection of methamphetamine precursor registries, OAG 05-174 (12/12/05).

53-11-407. Injunctions — Jury trial.

The criminal and circuit courts of this state may exercise jurisdiction to restrain or enjoin violations of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

The defendant may demand trial by jury for an alleged violation of an injunction or restraining order under this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 34; T.C.A., § 52-1441; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 62.

Law Reviews.

Drug Treatment Courts and Emergent Experimentalist Government, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 831 (2000).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

53-11-408. Bureau of investigation — Powers and duties.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging its responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and controlled substance analogues and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances and controlled substance analogues. To this end, it may:

Arrange for the exchange of information among governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances and controlled substance analogues;

Coordinate and cooperate in training programs concerning controlled substance and controlled substance analogue law enforcement at local and state levels;

Cooperate with the United States drug enforcement administration by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalogue, file and collect statistics, including records of drug dependent persons and other controlled substance and controlled substance analogue law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state and local law enforcement purposes. It shall not furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under subsection (c); and

Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled substances and controlled substance analogues may be extracted.

Results, information and evidence received from the United States drug enforcement administration relating to the regulatory functions of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, including results of inspections conducted by it, may be relied and acted upon by the Tennessee bureau of investigation in the exercise of its regulatory functions under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

A practitioner engaged in medical practice or research is not required or compelled to furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject to the Tennessee bureau of investigation, nor may the practitioner be compelled in any state or local civil, criminal, administrative, legislative or other proceedings to furnish the name or identity of an individual that the practitioner is obligated to keep confidential, except the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services may require the disclosure of information to the department of mental health and substance abuse services concerning individuals being treated with controlled substances that is necessary to ensure compliance by a practitioner and the practitioner's patient or research subject with state or federal laws and regulations governing the use of controlled substances.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 35; 1973, ch. 295, § 22; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 2; 1980, ch. 636, § 11; T.C.A., § 52-1442; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 63; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 86; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 848, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment, effective January 15, 2011, substituted “the commissioner of mental health may require the disclosure of information to the department of mental health” for “the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities may require the disclosure of information to the department of mental health and developmental disabilities” in (c).

The 2012 amendment by ch. 575 substituted “commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services may require the disclosure of information to the department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “commissioner of mental health may require the disclosure of information to the department of mental health” in (c).

The 2012 amendment by ch. 848 inserted “and controlled substance analogue” and “and controlled substance analogues” throughout (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 157. January 15, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 575, § 3. July 1, 2012.

Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Privileged Communications, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Medical Jurisprudence — Privileged Communications Between Physician and Patient — State Regulation and Right to Privacy, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 515.

53-11-409. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 53-11-409, concerning goods subject to forfeiture, was transferred to § 53-11-451 in 1990.

53-11-410. Evidence — Immunity from liability.

It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, in any complaint, information, indictment or other pleading or in any trial, hearing or other proceeding under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4. The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate registration or order form issued under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, the person is presumed not to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon the person to rebut the presumption.

No liability is imposed by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, upon any authorized state, county or municipal officer, engaged in the lawful performance of the officer's duties.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 37; T.C.A., § 52-1444; Acts 1990, ch. 1030, § 38.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 28.114.

Cited: McLean v. State, 527 S.W.2d 76, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. 1975); State v. Francisco, 790 S.W.2d 543, 1989 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 788 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1989).

53-11-411. Administrative decisions — Judicial review.

All final determinations, findings and conclusions of the department of safety, department of mental health and substance abuse services, department of health, or the board of pharmacy under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved.

Any person aggrieved by the decision may obtain review of the decision in the circuit court of Davidson County upon petition for writ of certiorari.

Findings of fact by the department of safety, department of mental health and substance abuse services, or department of health, or the board of pharmacy, if supported by substantial evidence, are conclusive.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 38; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1445; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 87, 88; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment, effective January 15, 2011, deleted “and developmental disabilities” following “mental health” in (a) and (c).

The 2012 amendment substituted “department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “department of mental health” in (a) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 157. January 15, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 575, § 3. July 1, 2012.

Cross-References. Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, ch. 5, part 1.

53-11-412. Research, instruction or chemical analysis.

No person shall manufacture, obtain, possess, administer or dispense any controlled substance or controlled substance analogue for the purpose of scientific research, instruction or chemical analysis except as provided in the Tennessee Legend Drug and Controlled Substance Research Act of 1984, compiled in chapter 14 of this title.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 39; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1446; Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 15; 2012, ch. 848, § 47.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment inserted “or controlled substance analogue”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

Law Reviews.

Medical Jurisprudence — Privileged Communications Between Physician and Patient — State Regulation and Right to Privacy, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 515.

53-11-413. Prior actions and pending litigation.

Prosecution for any violation of law occurring prior to July 1, 1971, is not affected or abated by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or former title 39, chapter 6, part 4 [repealed]. If the offense being prosecuted is similar to one set out in former §§ 39-6-417 — 39-6-419 [repealed], or in §§ 53-11-401 — 53-11-403, then the penalties under former §§ 39-6-417 — 39-6-419 [repealed], and under §§ 53-11-401 and 53-11-402 apply if they are less than those under prior law.

Civil seizures or forfeitures and injunctive proceedings commenced prior to July 1, 1971, are not affected by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or former title 39, chapter 6, part 4 [repealed].

All administrative proceedings pending under prior laws that are superseded by part 3 of this chapter and this part, or former title 39, chapter 6, part 4 [repealed], shall be continued and brought to a final determination in accordance with the laws and rules in effect prior to July 1, 1971. Any substance controlled under prior law that is not listed within Schedules I through VI is automatically controlled without further proceedings and shall be listed in the appropriate schedule.

The board of pharmacy shall initially permit persons to register who own or operate any establishment engaged in the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of any controlled substance prior to July 1, 1971, and who are registered or licensed by the state.

Part 3 of this chapter and this part, and former title 39, chapter 6, part 4 [repealed], apply to violations of law, seizures and forfeitures, injunctive proceedings, administrative proceedings and investigations that occur after July 1, 1971, and before November 1, 1989.

Part 3 of this chapter, this part and title 39, chapter 17, part 4 apply to violations of law, seizures and forfeitures, injunctive proceedings, administrative proceedings and investigations that occur on or after November 1, 1989.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 40; T.C.A., § 52-1447; Acts 1990, ch. 883, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Title 39, ch. 6, part 4, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 1. For new law, see title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

The controlled substances schedules, referred to in this section, appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

53-11-414. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Section 53-11-414 (Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 41; T.C.A., § 52-1448), concerning orders and rules in effect on July 1, 1971, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

53-11-415. Special revenue fund.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the county or municipality shall account for those funds received under title 39, chapter 17, part 4 in a special revenue fund. Upon demand of the chief executive of the arresting law enforcement agency, the county or municipality shall pay to that agency the funds demanded for use in cash transactions related to undercover investigative drug enforcement operations. The amount of the funds demanded and the requirement to pay the funds are subject to the availability of funds and budgetary appropriations for that purpose.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county trustee or city recorder shall set up a special account for those funds received under title 39, chapter 17, part 4. Upon demand of the chief executive of the arresting law enforcement agency, the county trustee or city recorder shall pay to that agency the demanded funds for use in the drug enforcement program. An accounting of all expenditures from the funds shall be made by the agency to the county trustee or city recorder.

Acts 1972, ch. 836, § 2; 1975, ch. 145, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-1450; Acts 1997, ch. 56, §§ 5, 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Use of drug law confiscations and fines to promote DARE programs or other drug abuse prevention programs, § 39-17-420.

Attorney General Opinions. Allocation of drug fines and forfeitures, OAG 93-63 (11/9/93).

53-11-416. Offense of prescription drug fraud.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to acquire or obtain, or attempt to acquire or obtain, possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception, or subterfuge or in violation of § 39-14-150. A violation of this section shall be deemed the offense of prescription drug fraud.

Prescription drug fraud is a continuing offense because the offense may involve an unlawful taking and use of personal identifying information that remains in the lawful possession of a victim wherever the victim currently resides or is found. As provided in this section, such unlawful taking and use may be elements of an offense of prescription drug fraud and continues to occur wherever the victim resides or is found.

For purposes of a violation of this section, “victim” includes, but is not limited to, the person whose personal identifying information, as defined in § 39-14-150(e), was acquired, obtained, possessed, bought, or used in violation of this section or sold, transferred, given, traded, loaned, delivered, or possessed in violation of this section. “Victim” also includes, but is not limited to, a physician, nurse practitioner, or other health care provider whose personal identifying information was unlawfully used.

Pursuant to §§ 39-11-103 and 39-14-150(j)(2), if a victim of prescription drug fraud resides or is found in this state, an essential element of the offense is committed in this state, and a defendant is subject to prosecution in this state, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in this state.

Venue for the offense of prescription drug fraud shall be in any county where an essential element of the offense was committed, including, but not limited to, in any county where the victim resides or is found, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in such county.

The offense of prescription drug fraud shall be punished in the same manner as a violation of § 53-11-402.

Acts 2013, ch. 151, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 151, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to offenses that occur on or after July 1, 2013.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 151, § 5. July 1, 2013.